Utah statutes.
78B-12-302.   Low income table -- Obligor parent only.

The table in this section shall be used to:

(1)  establish a child support order entered for the first time on or after January 1, 2008;

(2)  modify a child support order entered for the first time on or after January 1, 2008; 

(3)  modify a temporary judicial child support order established on or before December 31, 2007, if the new order is entered on or after January 1, 2008; or

(4)  modify a final child support order entered on or before December 31, 2007, if the modification is made on or after January 1, 2010.

Monthly Combined

Adj. Gross Income					Number of Children

         1		    2		      3		     4	               5	6

 From       To

      0 -     649		        30	   30		     30		    30		  30	        30

   650 -    675		        30	   30		     30		    30		  31	31

   676 -    700		        58	   60		     60		    61		  61	62

   701 -    725		        88	   88		     90		    91		  92	92

   726 -    750		      117	 118		   119		  120		122	123

   751 -    775				 148		   149		  151		153	155

   776 -    800				 178		   179		  182		183	186

   801 -    825				 207		   209		  212		214	216

   826 -    850				 236		   239		  242		244	247

   851 -    875				 266		   269		  272		275	278

   876 -    900						   299		  303		305	309

   901 -    925						   329		  333		337	339

   926 -    950								  363		366	370

   951 -    975								  393		398	402

   976 - 1,000										428	433

1,001 - 1,050											494

